Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-197.
Acknowledgment or proof of written instrument in which association interested; membership or employee status of public officer taking as affecting validity.

No public officer qualified to take acknowledgments or proofs of written instruments shall be disqualified from taking the acknowledgment or proof of any instrument in writing in which an association is interested by reason of his membership in or employment by an association so interested, and any such acknowledgments or proofs heretofore taken are hereby validated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 61(2); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 99; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 102; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 103; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 135; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 100; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-199.
Untrue, false and malicious statements calculated to injure reputation or business of certain savings associations; penalty for making.

Whoever willfully and knowingly makes, issues, circulates, transmits or causes to be made any statement, written, printed, reproduced in any manner, or by word of mouth, which is untrue in fact and is directly false and malicious in that it is calculated to injure the reputation or business of any association, federal association, federal home loan bank, the appropriate federal regulatory authority, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, shall upon conviction be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 61(3); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 100; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 103; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 104; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 136; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 101; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 103, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-201.
Advertising for deposits prohibited; exception as to certain state and federal banks, credit unions and associations.

From and after July 1, 1977, no person, whether or not incorporated, other than a bank or credit union organized under the laws of this state or of the United States, or an association organized under the laws of this state or of the United States, shall advertise by newspaper, radio, television, or other commercial media for deposits of money from the public. The commissioner shall have authority to enforce this prohibition by injunctive relief in the chancery court in which any such person may be a resident or domiciled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 62; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 101; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 104; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 105; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 137; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 102; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 104, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-203.
Applicability of chapter to previously incorporated savings associations; enforceability of obligations of such associations.

The name, rights, powers, privileges and immunities of every savings association heretofore incorporated in this state shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter to the same extent and effect as if such association had been incorporated pursuant hereto. Every such association shall possess the rights, powers, privileges and immunities and shall be subject to the duties, liabilities, disabilities and restrictions conferred and imposed by this chapter, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in its certificates of incorporation, bylaws, constitution or rules.

All obligations to any such association heretofore contracted shall be enforceable by it and in its name, and demands, claims and rights of action against any such association may be enforced against it as fully and completely as they could have been enforced heretofore.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 63; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 102; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 105; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 106; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 138; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 103; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 105, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-205.
Appeal from final rule, regulation or order of commissioner or board.

Any interested person aggrieved by any final rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or the board, shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved to appeal to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, except that if the appellant is an applicant for a charter the appeal shall be taken to the circuit court of the county in which the institution sought to be chartered would be domiciled, and if the appellant is seeking to establish a branch office, the appeal shall be taken to the circuit court of the county in which the branch is proposed to be located. Such appeal shall be taken and perfected as hereinafter provided, within thirty (30) days from the date of such final rule, regulation or order; and the circuit court may affirm such rule, regulation or order, or reverse same for further proceedings as justice may require. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected, heard and determined either in termtime or in vacation on the record, including a transcript of pleadings and testimony, both oral and documentary, filed and heard before the commissioner or the board, and such appeal shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court as a preference cause. In perfecting any appeal provided by this section, the provisions of law respecting notice to the reporter and the allowance of bills of exception, now or hereafter in force respecting appeals from the circuit court to Supreme Court shall be applicable. However, the reporter shall transcribe his notes and file the transcript of the record with the commissioner or the board within thirty (30) days after approval of the appeal bond. Upon the filing with the commissioner or the board of a petition for appeal to the circuit court, it shall be the duty of the commissioner or the board, as promptly as possible, and in any event within sixty (60) days after approval of the appeal bond, to file with the clerk of the circuit court to which the appeal is taken, a copy of the petition for appeal and of the rule, regulation or order appealed from, and the original and one (1) copy of the transcript of the record of proceedings in evidence before the commissioner or the board. After the filing of the petition, the appeal shall be perfected by the filing of bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) good and sufficient sureties or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as the surety, conditioned to pay the cost of such appeal; the bond to be approved by the commissioner or by the clerk of the court to which such appeal is taken. The perfection of an appeal shall not stay or suspend the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or the board, but the judge of the circuit court to which the appeal is taken may award a writ of supersedeas to any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or the board after five (5) days’ notice to the commissioner or the board and after hearing. Any order or judgment staying the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or the board shall contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the circuit judge and identified by reference thereto, that great or irreparable damage would result to the appellant if he is denied relief, and the stay shall not become effective until a supersedeas bond shall have been executed and filed with and approved by the clerk of the court payable to the state. The bond shall be in an amount fixed by the circuit judge and conditioned as the circuit judge may direct in the order granting the supersedeas.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 64; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 103; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 106; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 107; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 139; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 104; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-207.
Solicitation of deposits by association or its representatives without complying with provisions of chapter; penalty.

Where no other criminal penalty is specifically provided in this chapter, if any association or its agents, attorneys or solicitors, officers or directors, or any other person shall solicit or negotiate any deposit of money or in anywise transact any business regulated hereunder in this state without having first fully complied in good faith with the provisions of this chapter, such association and any such person, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 65; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 104; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 107; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 108; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 140; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 105; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 107, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-209.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 108, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 52; Laws, 1982, ch. 301, § 105; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 108; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 109; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 141; Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§ 81-12-211.
Unsafe or unfair practice; notice of charges.

If any person or association is engaging in, or has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the association’s business, or violation of any other law, rule, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, the commissioner may issue a notice of charges to such person or institution. A notice of charges shall specify the acts alleged to sustain a cease and desist order, and state the time and place at which a hearing shall be held. A hearing before the commissioner on the charges shall be held no earlier than seven (7) days, and no later than fifteen (15) days, after issuance of the notice. The charged institution is entitled to a further extension of seven (7) days upon filing a request with the commissioner. The commissioner may also issue a notice of charges if he has reasonable grounds to believe that any person or association is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound business practice, or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order. If, by a preponderance of the evidence, it is shown that any person or association is engaged in, or has been engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound business practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, a cease and desist order shall be issued which shall be permanently binding upon the person or institution until terminated by the commissioner.

If any person or association is engaging in, has engaged in, or is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the association’s business, or any violation of any law, rules, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, and the commissioner has determined that immediate corrective action is required, the commissioner may issue a temporary cease and desist order without prior notice. A temporary cease and desist order shall be effective immediately upon issuance for a period of fifteen (15) days, and may be extended once for a period of fifteen (15) days. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Cease and Desist Order.” A hearing before the commissioner shall be held within the time that the order remains effective, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or made permanent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 9; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 107, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-213.
Association in violation of provisions or cease and desist order; civil penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any association which is found to have violated any provision of this chapter may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). Any association which is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this chapter may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty and to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by an association from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 10; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 108, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-215.
Director, officer or employee violation of provisions or cease and desist order; civil penalty.

Any person, whether a director, officer or employee, who is found to have violated any provision of this chapter, whether willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, gross incompetency or recklessness, may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation. Any person who is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this chapter may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty, to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a director, officer or employee of an association from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 11; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 109, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-217.
Commissioner to issue supervisory control for association.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a solvent association is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner, or in any fashion which threatens the financial integrity or sound operation of the association, the commissioner may serve a notice of charges on the association, requiring it to show why it should not be placed under supervisory control. Such notice of charges shall specify the grounds for supervisory control, and set the time and place for a hearing. A hearing before the commissioner pursuant to such notice shall be held within fifteen (15) days after issuance of the notice of charges.

If, after the hearing provided above, the commissioner determines that supervisory control of the association is necessary to protect the association’s members, customers, stockholders or creditors, or the general public, the commissioner shall issue an order taking supervisory control of the association.

If the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner may appoint an agent to supervise and monitor the operations of the association during the period of supervisory control. During the period of supervisory control, the association shall act in accordance with such instructions as may be given by the commissioner, directly or through his supervisory agent, and shall not fail to act, except when to do so would violate an outstanding cease and desist order.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner shall issue an order approving a plan for the termination of supervisory control. The plan may provide for:

The issuance by the association of capital stock;

The appointment of one or more officers and/or directors;

The reorganization, merger or consolidation of the association;

The dissolution and liquidation of the association;

Other such measures as determined by the commissioner.

The order approving the plan shall not take effect until thirty (30) days after issuance during which time period an appeal may be filed in accordance with the provisions of Section 81-12-205.

All costs of this proceeding shall be paid by the association.

For the purpose of this section, an order shall be deemed final if:

No appeal is filed within the specific time allowed for the appeal; or

All judicial appeals are exhausted.

If an association is insolvent, the provisions of Section 81-12-183 shall apply.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 12; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 110, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-219.
Appeal of cease and desist order.

Any person or association against whom a cease and desist order is issued or a fine is imposed may have such order or fine reviewed by a court of competent jurisdiction. Except as otherwise provided, an appeal may be made only within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the order or the imposition of the fine, whichever is later.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 13; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 111, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-221.
Reimbursement of fines or penalties.

No person who is fined or penalized for a violation of any criminal provision of this chapter shall be reimbursed or indemnified in any fashion by the association for such fine or penalty.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 14; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 112, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-223.
Cumulative fines and penalties.

All penalties, fines and remedies provided by this chapter shall be cumulative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 15; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 113, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-225.
Credit allowed; discretion of commissioner.

In all examinations no association shall be allowed credit in excess of its sound value for a note or security of which the principal and interest is over twelve (12) months past due; nor for any bond in excess of the real value thereof; nor for any stock of its own held more than twelve (12) months; nor for any unsecured overdrafts that may have existed for a greater period than thirty (30) days next preceding it, except that the period shall be ninety (90) days for unsecured overdrafts upon which interest is being charged if the association has a written policy authorizing such overdrafts for not more than ninety (90) days. Only such overdrafts shall be considered as secure as are advanced against products or actual existing values evidenced by warehouse receipts or bills of lading, against bills of exchange drawn in good faith against actual existing values, or against funds on deposit by the depositor whose account is overdrawn, and who has pledged those funds as security for such overdraft, and in making up the statement of the condition of such association any such item shall be charged off (but if desired a note shall be appended giving details thereof). But the discretion of the commissioner or examiner may be exercised in cases of estates in litigation or administration, and in pending suits, if the security affected thereby is ample, in the opinion of the commissioner or examiner making such examination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 27; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 114, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-227.
Amount of liability to association for loans.

The liability to an association by a person, company, corporation or firm for money loaned, including in the liability of such person, company or firm, where a partnership, the liabilities of the several members thereof, shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the aggregate unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of said association.

The following shall not be restricted to or considered as coming within the limitations of twenty percent (20%) herein prescribed:

Loans and discounts secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actual existing values, provided the amount of such loans and discounts shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actual existing values.

Loans and discounts secured by bonds, certificates or notes constituting direct obligations of the United States government, or bonds fully guaranteed by the United States government, or by full faith and credit obligations of the State of Mississippi; provided, however, the commissioner shall from time to time determine and fix the maximum percentage of the par value of all such securities that may be loaned.

Loans and discounts to the extent that they are secured or covered by guaranties, or by commitments, or agreements to take over or purchase the same, made by any federal reserve bank, or by the United States, or any department, bureau, board, commission or establishment of the United States, including any corporation wholly owned directly or indirectly by the United States; provided that such guaranties, agreements or commitments are unconditional and are to be performed by payment within sixty (60) days after demand; provided, further, that the commissioner is hereby authorized to define the terms herein used and may by regulation control the making of loans under this paragraph (c).

Loans and discounts secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending bank to the credit of the borrower.

Any officer or director who shall approve or make loans prohibited in this section shall be liable individually for the full amount of the principal and interest of any such loan. If the commissioner shall discover, in any examination of any open bank that there is a loss on any loan made in violation of this section, he shall make demand of all directors and officers approving or making such loan for payment of the entire unpaid balance on any such loan.

Like demand shall be made and suit brought by the receiver of any bank in liquidation. Provided, however, this section shall not apply to loans to the State of Mississippi, or to any political subdivision thereof, nor to any levee district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 28; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 115, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 81-12-229.
Commissioner to furnish copy of call reports; fee; failure or refusal; misdemeanor.

A copy of the call reports of any association shall be furnished to any person or corporation requesting the same for a reasonable fee prescribed by the commissioner, which shall be collected by the commissioner and shall be paid into the department maintenance fund. If the commissioner fails or refuses to furnish copies of the report when so requested and tendered the proper fee; or if he fails to account for any such fees received by him; or if any person other than the commissioner, deputy commissioner, an examiner, or assistant furnishes any copy of such association report to anyone, whether for a consideration or without consideration, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or be imprisoned not more than one (1) month in the county jail, or both. However, this section shall not be construed to prevent any officer of the association from furnishing to anyone a statement of such association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 29; brought forward, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 116, eff from and after July 1, 1997.